Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6207.02
Directed review, defined.

Directed review shall mean a review conducted pursuant to section 71-6223.02 in which (1) there is no applicant group or application, (2) the duty of the committee is to formulate an initial proposal on the issues subject to review, and (3) the duty of the board and the director is to evaluate the proposal using the appropriate criteria and to make recommendations to the Legislature.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 105;

Laws 2015, LB90, § 1.